dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="/جانا__vblex_vf">
      <e><p>          <l>جاوں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاوں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاو</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>جاتیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گیا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئی</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئیں</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گیا</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>گئے</l><r>جانا<s n="vblex"/><s n="vf"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="جانا"><i></i><par n="/جانا__vblex_vf"/></e>
